North Dakota, session 69, HB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 65-01-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
65-01-15. Yearly documentation required for firefighter, correctional officer, and law
enforcement officer.
Except for benefits for an exposure to a bloodborne pathogen as defined by section
23-07.5-01 occurring in the course of employment, a full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer,
or law enforcement officer who uses tobacco is not eligible for the benefits provided under
sections 65-01-15.1 and 65-01-15.2, unless the full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or
law enforcement officer provides yearly documentation from a health care provider which
indicates the full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law enforcement officer has not
used tobacco for the preceding two years.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 65-01-15.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
65-01-15.1. Presumption of compensability for certain conditions of full-time paid
firefighters, correctional officers, and law enforcement officers.
1. Any condition or impairment of health of a full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer,
or law enforcement officer caused by lung or respiratory disease, hypertension, heart
disease, or an exposure to a bloodborne pathogen as defined by section 23-07.5-01
occurring in the course of employment, or occupational cancer in a full-time paid
firefighter, is presumed to have been suffered in the line of duty. The presumption may
Page No. 1 25.8055.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence the condition or impairment is not
work-related.
2. As used in this section, an occupational cancer is one which arises out of employment
as a full-time paid firefighter and is due to injury due to exposure to smoke, fumes, or
carcinogenic, poisonous, toxic, or chemical substances while in the performance of
active duty as a full-time paid firefighter.
3. A full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law enforcement officer is not eligible
for the benefit provided under this section unless that full-time paid firefighter,
correctional officer, or law enforcement officer has completed five years of continuous
service and has successfully passed a medical examination which fails to reveal any
evidence of such a condition. The five years of continuous service requirement may
include full-time paid service outside the state. An employer shall provide at no
expense a medical examination upon employment, for any employee subject to this
section.
a. After the initial medical examination, an employer shall provide at no expense at
least a periodic medical examination as follows: for one to ten years of service,
every five years; for eleven to twenty years of service, every three years; and for
twenty-one or more years of service, every year. The periodic medical
examination, at a minimum, must consist of a general medical history of the
individual and the individual's family; an occupational history including contact
with and an exposure to hazardous materials, toxic products, contagious and
infectious diseases, and to physical hazards; a physical examination including
measurement of height, weight, and blood pressure; and laboratory and
diagnostic procedures indicating cardiovascular health to a reasonable degree of
medical certainty.
b. If the medical examination reveals that an employee falls into a recognized risk
group, the employee must be referred to a qualified health professional for future
medical examination.
c. If a medical examination produces a false positive result for a condition covered
under this section, the organization shall consider the condition to be a
compensable injury. In the case of a false positive result, neither the coverage of
Page No. 2 25.8055.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the condition nor the period of disability may exceed fifty-six days. This section
does not affect an employee's responsibility to document that the employee has
not used tobacco as required under section 65-01-15. Results of the examination
must be used in rebuttal to a presumption afforded under this section.
4. For purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer":
a. "Correctional officer" means an individual who completed the department o f
corrections and rehabilitation's basic correctional officer course and is employed
ful l - time to provide supervision and security at a correctional facility by the
department of corrections and rehabilitation; and
b. "Law enforcement officer" means an individual who is licensed to perform peace
officer law enforcement duties under chapter 12-63 and is employed full time by
the bureau of criminal investigation, the game and fish department, the state
highway patrol, the parole and probation division, the North Dakota state
university police department, the North Dakota state college of science police
department, the university of North Dakota police department, the Bismarck state
college police department, a county sheriff's department, a city police
department, or the parks and recreation department pursuant to section
55-08-04.
5. The presumption does not include a condition or impairment of health of a full-time
paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law enforcement officer, who has been
employed for ten years or less, if the condition or impairment is diagnosed more than
two years after the employment as a full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or
law enforcement officer ends. The presumption also does not include a condition or
impairment of health of a full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law
enforcement officer, who has been employed more than ten years, if the condition or
impairment is diagnosed more than five years after the employment as a full-time paid
firefighter, correctional officer, or law enforcement officer ends.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 65-01-15.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 3 25.8055.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
65-01-15.2. Presumption of compensability for cardiac events of full-time paid
firefighters, correctional officers, and law enforcement officers.
1. A heart attack, stroke, vascular rupture, or other similar cardiac event, is presumed to
be a compensable injury when a full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law
enforcement officer:
a. Engages in a situation involving strenuous physical law enforcement or
correctional officer activity, fire suppression activity, or emergency response
activity, or participates in a training exercise involving strenuous physical activity;
and
b. The heart attack, stroke, vascular rupture, or other similar cardiac event occurs
no later than forty-eight hours after the full-time paid firefighter, correctional
officer, or law enforcement officer engaged or participated in the activity listed
under subdivision a.
2. The presumption under subsection 1 may be rebutted by clear and convincing
evidence the condition or impairment was not work related.
3. This section applies to any full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law
enforcement officer who has less than five years of continuous service.
4. A full-time paid firefighter, correctional officer, or law enforcement officer is not eligible
for the benefit provided under this section unless the full-time paid firefighter,
correctional officer, or law enforcement officer has successfully passed a medical
examination that failed to reveal any evidence of a cardiovascular condition.
5. For purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer":
a. "Correctional officer" means an individual who is employed as a correctiona l
officer by the department of corrections and rehabilitation; and
b. "Law enforcement officer" means an individual who is licensed to perform peace
officer law enforcement duties under chapter 12-63 and is employed full time by
the bureau of criminal investigation, the game and fish department, the state
highway patrol, the parole and probation division, the North Dakota state
university police department, the North Dakota state college of science police
department, the university of North Dakota police department, the Bismarck state
college police department, a county sheriff's department, a city police
Page No. 4 25.8055.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
department, or the parks and recreation department pursuant to section
55-08-04.
Page No. 5 25.8055.01000